District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.08

Duty of Mayor to order or provide services.

(a)

If the Mayor determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the Mayor may order the agency to perform its duties under this chapter or may provide those services directly to the individual.

(b)

The Mayor may determine that a foreign country or political subdivision has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with the District and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 307a
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(h), 45 DCR 2924
redesignated § 308, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(8), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-301.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.7a.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.07a

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “§ 46-303.07a. Mayor to order or provide services. ”If the Mayor determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the Mayor may order the agency to perform its duties under this chapter or may provide those services directly to the individual.”

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(h) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(h) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.08 has been recodified as § 46-303.09 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(9).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 308 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).